District of Columbia statutes.
23-1308

Appropriation; budget.

There are authorized to be appropriated through the State Justice Institute in each fiscal year such sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter. Funds appropriated by Congress for the District of Columbia Pretrial Services Agency shall be received by the Director of the Court Services and Offender Supervision Agency for the District of Columbia, and shall be disbursed by that Director to and on behalf of the District of Columbia Pretrial Services Agency. The District of Columbia Pretrial Services Agency shall submit to the Director of the Court Services and Offender Supervision Agency for the District of Columbia at the time and in the form prescribed by that Director, reports of its activities and financial position and its proposed budget.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 761, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11271(a)
Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2427, Pub. L. 105-274, § 7(c)(2)(E)
1981 Ed., § 23-1308.
1973 Ed., § 23-1308.